Hawaii, session 2025, SB609.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $250,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the state office of veterans' services to perform its statutory duties pursuant to chapter 363, Hawaii Revised Statutes, including: (1)  Maintaining a center that provides information, counsel, aid, and assistance to veterans, their families, and their dependents, pursuant to section 363-3(1), Hawaii Revised Statutes; and (2)  Cooperating with federal agencies responsible for the administration of rights and benefits granted to veterans, their families, and their dependents, pursuant to section 363-3(4), Hawaii Revised Statutes; provided that the office of veterans' services may use moneys appropriated to contract with qualified entities pursuant to chapter 103D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for the purposes of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the office of veterans' services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 2.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________